District of Columbia statutes.
1-335.05

Indemnification.

Present, future, and former District of Columbia Retirement Board members and employees shall be indemnified by the District of Columbia from all claims and liability, including court costs and attorney’s fees, because of any action taken pursuant to this part.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-106, § 6, 54 DCR 12223
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-337, § 201(c), 56 DCR 939
D.C. Law 17-337 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “§ 1-335.05 Other legal obligations. With respect to actions taken in compliance with this subchapter, including all good faith determinations regarding companies as required by this subchapter, the Public Fund shall be exempt from any conflicting statutory or common law obligations, including any such obligations in respect to choice of asset managers, investment funds, or investments for the Public Fund’s securities portfolios.”